Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1318
Real property taxes; back interest and penalties; when; appeal.

All taxes charged under section 77-1317 shall be exempt from any back interest or penalty and shall be collected in the same manner as other taxes levied upon real estate, except for taxes charged on improvements to real property made after September 1, 1980. Interest at the rate provided in section 77-207 and the following penalties and interest on penalties for late reporting or failure to report such improvements pursuant to section 77-1318.01 shall be collected in the same manner as other taxes levied upon real property. The penalty for late reporting or failure to report improvements made to real property after September 1, 1980, shall be as follows: (1) A penalty of twelve percent of the tax due on the improvements for each taxing period for improvements voluntarily filed or reported after March 19 has passed, except in any county with a population of at least one hundred thousand inhabitants according to the most recent federal decennial census, after March 25 has passed; and (2) a penalty of twenty percent of the tax due on improvements for each taxing period for improvements not voluntarily reported for taxation purposes after March 19 has passed, except in any county with a population of at least one hundred thousand inhabitants according to the most recent federal decennial census, after March 25 has passed. Interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, shall be assessed upon such penalty from the date of delinquency of the tax until paid. No penalty excluding interest shall be charged in excess of one thousand dollars per year. For purposes of this section, improvement shall mean any new construction of or change to an item of real property as defined in section 77-103.

Any additional taxes, penalties, or interest on penalties imposed pursuant to this section may be appealed in the same manner as appeals are made under section 77-1233.06.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 119, p. 428;

R.S.1913, § 6434;

C.S.1922, § 5969;

C.S.1929, § 77-1615;

R.S.1943, § 77-1318;

Laws 1980, LB 689, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 835, § 7;

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 43;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 51;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 72;

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 23;

Laws 2011, LB384, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB834, § 17.
July 18, 2026